Utah statutes.
4-13-4.   Labeling requirements for specialty fertilizer, bulk commercial
fertilizer, packaged mixed fertilizer, and soil amendments specified.
(1)  Each container of specialty commercial fertilizer distributed in this
state shall bear a label setting forth:
(a)  its net weight;
(b)  brand and grade;
(c)  guaranteed analysis;
(d)  the name and address of the registrant; and
(e)  the lot number.
(2) (a)  Each bulk shipment of commercial fertilizer distributed in this state
shall be accompanied by a printed or written statement setting forth the
information specified in Subsections (1)(a) through (e).
(b)  The statement shall be delivered to the purchaser at the time the bulk
fertilizer is delivered.
(3)  Each sale of packaged mixed fertilizer shall be labeled, or labeling
furnished the consumer, to show its net weight, guaranteed analysis, lot
number, and the name and address of the distributor.
(4) (a)  Each container of soil amendment shall conform to the requirements of
Subsection (1), and if distributed in bulk, with Subsection (2).
(b)  The name or chemical designation and content of the soil amending
ingredient or any other information prescribed by rule of the department shall
appear whether distributed in a container or in bulk.
